Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,175
Notice of intent to demand payment
and consequences of voting or consenting.

(MBCA 13.21) (a) If a corporate action specified in subsection
(a) of section 21-2,172 is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting,
a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class
or series of shares:

(1) Must deliver to the corporation,
before the vote is taken, written notice of the shareholder's intent to demand
payment if the proposed action is effectuated; and

(2) Must not vote, or cause or permit
to be voted, any shares of such class or series in favor of the proposed action.

(b) If a corporate action
specified in subsection (a) of section 21-2,172 is to be approved by less
than unanimous written consent, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal
rights with respect to any class or series of shares must not sign a consent
in favor of the proposed action with respect to that class or series of shares.

(c) A shareholder who fails
to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) or (b) of this section is not
entitled to payment under sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 175.